South Dakota, session 2026, SB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17F:
A health carrier may not, through contract or otherwise, assess or impose upon a
participating health care provider an administrative fee or, penalty, or payment reduction,
related to any provision of care to a patient that, member, or enrollee, which involved an
out-of-network provider.
For purposes of this section, an "out-of-network provider," means a provider, of
any item or service, who is not a participating provider.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.